Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.230

Destruction of insufficient recall petition.

If it is found that the recall petition does not contain the requisite number of signatures of certified legal voters, the officer shall so notify the persons filing the petition, and at the expiration of thirty days from the conclusion of the count the officer shall destroy the petitions unless prevented therefrom by the injunction or mandate of a court.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1419; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.110. Prior: 1913 c 146 s 9, part; RRS s 5358, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.110.]